Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.

Sec. 08.71.080.
License required.

A person may not act as a dispensing optician in the state unless the person is licensed under this chapter. A license shall be issued for (1) the dispensing of contact lenses, or (2) the dispensing of other lenses, eyeglasses, spectacles, artificial eyes, and their appurtenances, or (3) both. The department shall by endorsement on the license designate for which aspect of dispensing opticianry the license is issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 14 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 92 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.

For continuing competence, see 12 AAC 30, art. 3.

Sec. 08.71.085.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.71.090.
Examination requirement.

To be licensed to dispense contact lenses, a person, unless eligible for licensing under AS

08.71.145

, shall document to the department that the person has passed the contact lens registry examination offered by the National Contact Lens Examiners with a score acceptable to the department. In order to be licensed to dispense other lenses, eyeglasses, spectacles, artificial eyes, and their appurtenances, a person, unless eligible for licensing under AS

08.71.145

, shall document to the department that the person has passed the national opticianry competency examination offered by the American Board of Opticianry with a score acceptable to the department. An applicant for licensure in both areas shall document having received a score acceptable to the department on both examinations. The department shall, by regulation, establish the scores that will be acceptable for the examinations described in this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 15 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 92 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 58 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.

Sec. 08.71.100.
Administration of examination. [Repealed, § 12 ch 58 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 08.71.110.
Qualifications for licensure.

The department may issue a license to a person who

has had education equivalent to four years attendance at a high school;

has either

completed at least 1,800 hours of training as an apprentice after registering with the department as an apprentice; or

been engaged for at least 1,800 hours as a practicing optician in good standing in a state, territory, district, or possession of the United States;

has passed the applicable examination required under AS

08.71.090

with a score acceptable to the department;

has passed a course designated in the department’s regulations as being acceptable; and

has paid the required license fee.

Graduation from an associate degree program in a recognized school or college of opticianry may be substituted for the experience required by (a)(2) and (4) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 145 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 58 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.

Sec. 08.71.120.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for initial license and license renewal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 5 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 42 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 58 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.71.130.
Renewal of license.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

If the license remains lapsed for more than one year, the department may require the applicant to retake and successfully pass again the applicable examination or examinations required under AS

08.71.090

.

Before a license may be renewed, the licensee shall submit to the department evidence of continuing competence in optical dispensing as prescribed by regulations of the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 6 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 43 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 145 SLA 1986; am § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 58 SLA 2002; am §§ 7, 8 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For license duration and further provisions relating to renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For continuing competence, see 12 AAC 30, art. 3.

Sec. 08.71.140.
Display of license.

A licensed dispensing optician shall conspicuously display a personal license issued under this chapter in any place that the licensed dispensing optician transacts business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973)

Sec. 08.71.145.
Licensure by credentials.

A person with a valid license as a dispensing optician from another state, territory, district, or possession of the United States with licensing requirements substantially equivalent to or higher than those of this state shall be issued a license under this chapter for those professional areas in which the person is licensed in the other jurisdiction upon payment of any fee and documentation that the department may require by regulation.

History.

(§ 7 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 92 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 58 SLA 2002; am § 9 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.

Sec. 08.71.150.
Issuance of license by reciprocity. [Repealed, § 5 ch 92 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.71.160.
Dispensing optician’s apprentice.

A person may be employed by or serve under a licensed physician, optometrist, or dispensing optician as an apprentice for dispensing optician tasks. An apprentice shall register with the department before beginning employment or service as an apprentice, shall be designated as an apprentice in the records of the department, and shall be in training under the regular supervision of a licensed physician, optometrist, or dispensing optician. Notwithstanding AS

08.71.180

, a registered apprentice may perform dispensing optician tasks that are delegated by and performed under the regular supervision of the licensed physician, optometrist, or dispensing optician and may use the title “dispensing optician apprentice.”

No more than two apprentices may be under the direct supervision of one licensed dispensing optician at the same time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 8 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 51 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 58 SLA 2002; am § 10 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.

Sec. 08.71.163.
Dispensing optician’s assistant.

Notwithstanding AS

08.71.180

, a person who is not a licensed dispensing optician or a registered apprentice under AS

08.71.160

may perform dispensing optician tasks that are delegated by and performed under the regular supervision of a licensed physician, optometrist, or dispensing optician. The hours spent as an assistant under this section may not be counted toward satisfaction of the training requirement in AS

08.71.110(a)

, and the assistant may not use a title that includes the word “optician” or “opticianry.”

History.

(§ 11 ch 58 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.

Sec. 08.71.165.
Delegation authorized.

A licensed physician, optometrist, or dispensing optician may delegate dispensing optician tasks to an apprentice or assistant. The licensee shall regularly supervise the performance of the delegated tasks and retains responsibility for the proper performance of the delegated tasks.

History.

(§ 11 ch 58 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.